North Carolina, session 2025, HB785.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The Department of Public Instruction shall study methods of
implementing budget flexibility guidelines for local school administrative units. Flexibilities
include methods of combining allotments, allowing transfers between allotments, or other
methods the Department deems viable. The Department shall submit a report to the Joint
Legislative Education Oversight Committee and the Fiscal Research Division on or before April
1, 2026. The report shall identify areas where a greater amount of flexibility would enable local
boards of education to meet the needs of students, teachers, administrators, and other school
employees, along with any legislative recommendations.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in nonrecurring funds for the
2025-2026 fiscal year to be used to conduct the study required by this act.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H785-v-1*